New York, session 2025-2026, A6546.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6808 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Prohibitions. a. No person, firm, corporation or association shall 4 both directly or indirectly own, operate, control, or direct the opera- 5 tion of the whole or any part of a pharmacy and directly or indirectly 6 own, operate or control the whole or any part of a pharmacy benefit 7 manager. 8 b. No later than three years after this subdivision shall have become 9 a law, any person, firm, corporation or association in violation of 10 paragraph a of this subdivision shall divest from the ownership, opera- 11 tion or control of such pharmacy. 12 c. "Pharmacy benefit manager" shall have the same meaning as defined 13 by section two hundred eighty-a of the public health law. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10487-01-5